District of Columbia statutes.
48-714

Rules.

(a)

The Mayor shall issue rules pursuant to this chapter in accordance with the provisions of subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

(b)

The proposed rules shall include, but not be limited to:

(1)

A schedule of license fees;

(2)

Standards for the exemption of certain employees employed by a licensed manufacturer, distributor, or wholesaler;

(3)

Procedures to govern the issuance, denial, renewal, suspension, conversion, or revocation of a license; and

(4)

Standards pertaining to labeling, handling, recordkeeping, and storage.

June 13, 1990, D.C. Law 8-137, § 15, 37 DCR 2631
1981 Ed., § 33-1014.